Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5192.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "local government lobbyist prohibition act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Lobbying" means that term as defined in section 5 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.415. (b) "Lobbyist" means that term as defined in section 5 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.415. (c) "Local government" means a city, village, township, county, school district, community college district, intermediate school district, port authority, or airport authority. Sec. 5. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a local government shall not contract with a person required to register as a lobbyist under 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.411 to 4.431, for the purpose of lobbying. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to either of the following: (a) An individual who is an employee of the local government. (b) A contract that was entered into before the effective date of this act.